Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB353.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 337.055 is amended to read as follows:
Any employee who leaves or is discharged from his or her employment shall be paid in
full all wages or salary earned by him or her; not later than the next normal pay period
following the date of dismissal or voluntary leaving or fourteen (14) days following such
date of dismissal or voluntary leaving whichever last occurs. Any employee who is
absent at the time fixed for payment by an employer, or who, for any other reason, is not
paid at that time, shall be paid thereafter at any time or upon fourteen (14) days' demand.
No employer shall, by any means, secure exemption from this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:49 AM Jacketed